test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTA_AM_CNJ_waabam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Cnj - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6
  #theme    neg     persnum periph  prt     dub
     
     #this is extrapolated from book (p 295-301)
     #book has +Dub in -e(n) for positive, -en(h) for negative
     #regularized to across the board -enh
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isinoon (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl: waabmiswaang  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2+Pl: waabmisweg    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2:    waabmiswan       #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1:      waabmigsiwaanh    #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl:   waabmigsiwaang #0 v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+1+Pl: waabmigsiwang #0 v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl:   waabmigsiweg    #0 v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2:      waabmigsiwan       #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl: waabmigoosweg #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2:    waabmigooswan    #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl: waabmisnoon'gog #1sg v 2pl'
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2:    waabmisnoonaanh     #1sg v 2sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS REPLACES NULL THEME SIGN
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      -igo (3sg v 2pl) THIS IS NEW -> probable typo

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl:   waabmaaswangdwaa    #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3:      waabmaaswangid      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl:      waabmaaswagwaa      #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3:         waabmaaswag         #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmaaswangwaa     #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3:    waabmaaswang        #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:   waabmaaswegwaa      #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3:      waabmaasweg         #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl:      waabmaaswadwaa      #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3:         waabmaaswad         #2sg v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmiswangdwaa   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3:    waabmiswangid         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmisnowngwaa  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3:    waabmisnowang     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:    waabmisnoowegwaa     #3pl v 2pl

     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3:    waabmisnoweg     #3sg v 2pl !expect this if neg = negprt-prt in book
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3:    waabmigsiweg     #3sg v 2pl !book has this (perhaps an error?)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS NEW (relative to positive forms)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      NULL THEME ABSENT
     #      (might expect -igo from neu neg (3sg v 2pl), but not)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:   waabmaaswangdwaaba  #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Prt:      waabmaaswangdiba      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl+Prt:      waabmaaswagwaaba    #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Prt:         waabmaaswagba       #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmaaswangwaaba   #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmaaswangba      #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:   waabmaaswegwaaba    #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt:      waabmaaswegba       #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl+Prt:      waabmaaswadwaaba    #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Prt:         waabmaaswadba       #2sg v 3sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Prt:         waabmaaswidba       #2sg v 3sg !book has wid instead of wad (!)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmiswangdwaaba #3pl v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmisiiwngidwaaba #3pl v 1pl !book has siiw instead of siw
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmiswangdiba       #3sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmisiiwngidba       #3sg v 1pl !bookindicates variation between siw and siiw

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Prt: waabmisnowngwaaba  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmisnowngiba     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:    waabmisnoowegwaaba   #3pl v 2pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Prt:    waabmisnowegwaaba   #3pl v 2pl !book has isinow ... which makes more sense than isinoow here/in neutral (usually a dub thing)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmigsinwegba   #3sg v 2pl !book 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Prt:    waabmigsiwegba   #3sg v 2pl !expected if prt neg extends neg, but perhaps neg was wrong...

     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -aa (3 obj) THIS IS NEW (relative to positive forms)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -inin->isinow, isinoow  (2 obj)
     #      -igo (3sg v 2pl) THIS IS NEW
     #      NULL THEME ABSENT

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:   waabmaasiiwngidwaawenh     #1pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Dub:      waabmaasiiwngidenh      #1pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Pl+Dub:      waabmaasiiwgwaawenh      #1sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+1+3+Dub:         waabmaasiiwgenh         #1sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabmaasiiwngwaawenh     #21pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmaasiiwngenh        #21pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:   waabmaasiiwegwaawenh      #2pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Dub:      waabmaasiiwegenh         #2pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Pl+Dub:      waabmaasiiwdwaawenh      #2sg v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+2+3+Dub:         waabmaasiiwdenh         #2sg v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabmisiiwngidwaawenh   #3pl v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmisiiwngidenh         #3sg v 1pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl+Dub: waabmisnoowngwaawenh  #3pl v 21pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmisnoowngenh     #3sg v 21pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl+Dub:    waabmisnoowegwaawenh     #3pl v 2pl

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmigsiiwegwenh     #3sg v 2pl !cons
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Dub:    waabmisnoowegwenh    #3sg v 2pl !book guess, currently have isinoo for 3pl but not 3 as a general pattern


     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isinoon (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: waabmiswaangba  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: waabmiswegba    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2+Prt:    waabmiswamba     #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:   waabmigsiwaangba #0 v 1pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Prt:      waabmigsiwaamba   #0 v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt: waabmigsiwngiba #0 v 21pl !book unsure 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:   waabmigsiwegba    #0 v 2pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Prt:      waabmigsiwmba     #0 v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: waabmigooswegba #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Prt:    waabmigooswamba  #1pl v 2sg !book indicates optional siiw (yikes)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: waabmisnoon'gogba #1sg v 2pl !'predict this
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl: waabmisnoonwegba #1sg v 2pl !book has this, is unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Prt:    waabmisnoonaambaanh   #1sg v 2sg !cons guess
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Prt:    waabmisnoonaambaa   #1sg v 2sg !book unsure

     #Values from slots numbered+Dub: 1, 2, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order+Dub: 
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (here 0sub only)
     #      -igoo (1pl v 2)
     #      -inin->isiino, isinoon (?) (2 obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: waabmisiiwaangenh  #2pl v 1pl, 2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: waabmisiiwegwenh    #2pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+2+Dub:    waabmisiiwnenh       #2sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Dub:      waabmigsiiwaanenh    #0 v 1sg  !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:   waabmigsiiwaangenh #0 v 1pl    !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+1+Pl+Dub: waabmigsiiwngenh #0 v 21pl     !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:   waabmigsiiwegwenh    #0 v 2pl  !cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+2+Dub:      waabmigsiiwnenh       #0 v 2sg !cons best guess

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: waabmigooswegwenh #1pl v 2pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Dub:    waabmigooswanenh    #1pl v 2sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: waabmisnoon'gogwenh #1sg v 2pl !'cons best guess
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Dub:    waabmisnoonaanenh     #1sg v 2sg (cons)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+2+Dub:    waabmisiinwaanenh     #1sg v 2sg (book, has irregular sii length, short o)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg) (treated as Thm2a!)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl: waabmaasgwaa   #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3:    waabmaasig     #3sg v 3obv  !book omits form!

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3+Pl: waabmisgwaa   #3pl v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3:    waabmisig         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl: waabmigsigwaa #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3:    waabmigsig      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3+Pl: waabmisnokwaa   #3pl v 2sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg+3:    waabmisnog         #3sg v 2sg
 
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa (3 obj)
     #      -i (1 obj)
     #      -igo (inversion (ambig: 0sub, 3obv v 3))
     #      -ik->isinog  (3 v 2sg)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Pl+Prt: waabmaasiiwaapa   #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmDir+Neg+3+Prt:    waabmaasiipa   #3sg v 3obv  

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3+Pl+Prt: waabmisgwaaba   #3pl v 1sg !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Thm1+Neg+3+Prt:    waabmisgoba         #3sg v 1sg

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl+Prt: waabmigsigwaaba #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book unsure
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+ThmInv+Neg+3+Prt:    waabmigsigba    #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !book semi-unsure
